Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.543

IMPACT center—Contributions and support.

The IMPACT center shall aggressively solicit financial contributions and support from nonstate sources, including the agricultural industries and producer organizations and individuals, to help fund its research and education programs, and shall use previously appropriated funds of Washington State University and existing resources as much as is possible to further the center's activities.

[ 1985 c 39 s 5; 1984 c 57 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 39: See note following RCW 28B.30.535.